Maryland, session 2025, HB1113.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Election Law
3–203.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1113*

HOUSE BILL 1113
(2) (i) “Applicable transaction” means:
1. at the Motor Vehicle Administration, an initial application
for or renewal of a driver’s license or identification card, or a change of name or address on
an existing driver’s license or identification card, or any other transaction in which the
Motor Vehicle Administration obtains all of the information from an applicant that satisfies
the requirements to register to vote;
2. at the Maryland Health Benefit Exchange, any application
for or renewal of health insurance coverage;
3. at a local department of social services, an initial
application for a State or federally funded public assistance program or an application for
a recertification, renewal, or change of name or address relating to a State or federally
funded public assistance program; or
4. at the Mobility Certification Office in the Maryland
Transit Administration, an initial application for paratransit service or an application for
recertification for paratransit service.
(ii) “Applicable transaction” includes any transaction described in
subparagraph (i) of this paragraph that is completed online.
(III) “APPLICABLE TRANSACTION” DOES NOT INCLUDE A REAL
ID TRANSACTION.
(3) “Automatic voter registration agency” means:
(i) the Motor Vehicle Administration;
(ii) the Maryland Health Benefit Exchange;
(iii) local departments of social services; and
(iv) the Mobility Certification Office in the Maryland Transit
Administration.
(4) “Automatic voter registration system” means a system that, as an
integral part of each applicable transaction at an automatic voter registration agency:
(i) informs an applicant:
1. that the applicant shall be registered to vote or shall have
a voter registration record updated, if applicable, unless the applicant declines to register
to vote or update a voter registration record or if the applicant is not eligible to register to
vote;

HOUSE BILL 1113 3
2. of the qualifications to register to vote under § 3–102 of
this title;
3. that the applicant should not register if the applicant does
not meet all the qualifications;
4. of the penalties for the submission of a false application;
and
5. that voter registration is voluntary and that neither
registering nor declining to register to vote will in any way affect the availability of services
or benefits;
(ii) requires the electronic signature of the applicant, subject to the
penalties for perjury, by which the applicant attests that the information provided by the
applicant is true and that the applicant meets all the qualifications to become a registered
voter, including United States citizenship; and
(iii) electronically transmits the voter registration information of
each applicant who does not decline to register to vote or update a voter registration record
directly to the State Board:
1. in a manner and format specified jointly by the automatic
voter registration agency and the State Board; and
2. within 5 days of the applicable transaction.
(5) “ENHANCED AUTOMATIC VOTER REGISTRATION NOTICE” MEANS
A NOTICE IN A FORMAT PRESCRIBED BY THE STATE BOARD THAT:
(I) INCLUDES A STATEMENT EXPLAINING:
1. THAT THE APPLICANT SHALL BE REGISTERED TO
VOTE UNLESS THE APPLICANT DECLINES TO REGISTER TO VOTE OR IF THE
APPLICANT IS NOT ELIGIBLE TO REGISTER TO VOTE;
2. THE QUALIFICATIONS TO REGISTER TO VOTE UNDER §
3–102 OF THIS TITLE;
3. THAT THE APPLICANT SHOULD DECLINE
REGISTRATION IF THE APPLICANT DOES NOT MEET ALL THE QUALIFICATIONS FOR
VOTER REGISTRATION;
4. THE PENALTIES FOR SUBMISSION OF A FALSE
APPLICATION;

HOUSE BILL 1113
5. THAT VOTER REGISTRATION IS VOLUNTARY AND THAT
NEITHER REGISTERING NOR DECLINING TO REGISTER TO VOTE WILL IN ANY WAY
AFFECT THE AVAILABILITY OF SERVICES OR BENEFITS; AND
6. THAT IF THE APPLICANT DOES NOT SELECT A
POLITICAL PARTY AFFILIATION, THE INDIVIDUAL WILL BE DESIGNATED AS NOT
AFFILIATED WITH A POLITICAL PARTY AND WILL BE UNABLE TO VOTE IN A PARTY
PRIMARY ELECTION;
(II) ALLOWS THE APPLICANT TO:
1. DECLINE TO BE REGISTERED TO VOTE BY MAKING AN
APPROPRIATE NOTATION AND RETURNING THE NOTICE POSTAGE PREPAID; AND
2. IF THE APPLICANT DID NOT SELECT A POLITICAL
PARTY AFFILIATION AT THE MOTOR VEHICLE ADMINISTRATION, SELECT A
POLITICAL PARTY AFFILIATION BY MAKING AN APPROPRIATE NOTATION AND
RETURNING THE NOTICE POSTAGE PREPAID;
(III) INCLUDES INSTRUCTIONS REGARDING HOW THE
APPLICANT MAY SELECT A POLITICAL PARTY AFFILIATION ELECTRONICALLY; AND
(IV) MAY BE COMBINED WITH A VOTER ACKNOWLEDGEMENT
NOTICE OR VOTER NOTIFICATION CARD DESCRIBED IN § 3–301(C) OF THIS TITLE.
(6) “ENHANCED AUTOMATIC VOTER REGISTRATION SYSTEM” MEANS
A SYSTEM THAT, AS AN INTEGRAL PART OF EACH REAL ID TRANSACTION AT THE
MOTOR VEHICLE ADMINISTRATION:
(I) DOES NOT ELECTRONICALLY TRANSMIT THE VOTER
REGISTRATION INFORMATION OF AN APPLICANT TO THE STATE BOARD IF THE
APPLICANT HAS PRESENTED A DOCUMENT AS PART OF THE REAL ID TRANSACTION
DEMONSTRATING THAT THE APPLICANT IS NOT A CITIZEN OF THE UNITED STATES
AT THE TIME OF THE REAL ID TRANSACTION;
(II) ELECTRONICALLY TRANSMITS THE VOTER REGISTRATION
INFORMATION NECESSARY TO UPDATE THE NAME OR ADDRESS OF AN APPLICANT
DIRECTLY TO THE STATE BOARD WITHIN 5 DAYS AFTER THE REAL ID
TRANSACTION IF THE APPLICANT IS CURRENTLY REGISTERED TO VOTE IN THE
STATE;

HOUSE BILL 1113 5
(III) ELECTRONICALLY TRANSMITS THE VOTER REGISTRATION
INFORMATION OF AN APPLICANT DIRECTLY TO THE STATE BOARD WITHIN 5 DAYS
AFTER THE REAL ID TRANSACTION IF THE APPLICANT:
1. IS NOT CURRENTLY REGISTERED TO VOTE IN THE
STATE;
2. HAS PRESENTED A DOCUMENT AS PART OF THE REAL
ID TRANSACTION DEMONSTRATING THAT THE APPLICANT IS A CITIZEN OF THE
UNITED STATES; AND
3. HAS PROVIDED INFORMATION AS PART OF THE REAL
ID TRANSACTION DEMONSTRATING THAT THE APPLICANT IS AT LEAST 16 YEARS
OLD AND IS A RESIDENT OF THE STATE; AND
(IV) BEFORE ELECTRONICALLY TRANSMITTING THE
APPLICANT’S VOTER REGISTRATION INFORMATION TO THE STATE BOARD UNDER
ITEM (II) OR (III) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, OFFERS THE APPLICANT THE OPPORTUNITY
TO SELECT A POLITICAL PARTY AFFILIATION.
(7) “ENHANCED AUTOMATIC VOTER REGISTRATION UPDATE NOTICE”
MEANS A NOTICE IN A FORMAT PRESCRIBED BY THE STATE BOARD THAT:
(I) INCLUDES A STATEMENT EXPLAINING THAT THE
APPLICANT’S VOTER REGISTRATION HAS BEEN UPDATED, AND STATING THAT IF THE
UPDATE WAS IN ERROR, THE APPLICANT SHOULD CORRECT THE UPDATE;
(II) ALLOWS THE APPLICANT TO CORRECT THE UPDATE BY
MAKING AN APPROPRIATE NOTATION AND RETURNING THE NOTICE POSTAGE
PREPAID; AND
(III) MAY BE COMBINED WITH A VOTER ACKNOWLEDGEMENT
NOTICE OR VOTER NOTIFICATION CARD DESCRIBED IN § 3–301(C) OF THIS TITLE.
[(5)] (8) “Local department of social services” means:
(i) the local departments of social services in the Department of
Human Services; and
(ii) the Montgomery County Department of Health and Human
Services.
(9) (I) “REAL ID TRANSACTION” MEANS A TRANSACTION AT THE
MOTOR VEHICLE ADMINISTRATION FOR:

HOUSE BILL 1113
1. AN INITIAL APPLICATION FOR OR RENEWAL OF A
DRIVER’S LICENSE OR AN IDENTIFICATION CARD THAT IS COMPLIANT WITH THE
FEDERAL REAL ID ACT;
2. A CHANGE OF NAME OR ADDRESS ON AN EXISTING
DRIVER’S LICENSE OR IDENTIFICATION CARD THAT IS COMPLIANT WITH THE
FEDERAL REAL ID ACT; OR
3. ANY OTHER TRANSACTION THAT IS COMPLIANT WITH
THE FEDERAL REAL ID ACT IN WHICH THE MOTOR VEHICLE ADMINISTRATION
OBTAINS ALL THE INFORMATION FROM AN APPLICANT THAT SATISFIES THE
REQUIREMENTS TO REGISTER TO VOTE.
(II) “REAL ID TRANSACTION” INCLUDES ANY TRANSACTION
DESCRIBED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH THAT IS COMPLETED
ONLINE.
(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, an automatic
voter registration agency shall implement an automatic voter registration system on or
before July 1, 2019.
(2) A local department of social services shall implement an automatic
voter registration system on or before December 1, 2019.
(3) THE MOTOR VEHICLE ADMINISTRATION SHALL IMPLEMENT AN
ENHANCED AUTOMATIC VOTER REGISTRATION SYSTEM ON OR BEFORE JULY 1,
2027.
(c) An automatic voter registration system AND AN ENHANCED AUTOMATIC
VOTER REGISTRATION SYSTEM:
(1) may not require any information that duplicates the information
required to complete an applicable transaction OR A REAL ID TRANSACTION;
(2) shall require only the minimum amount of information necessary for
both an applicable transaction OR A REAL ID TRANSACTION and a voter registration to:
(i) prevent duplicate voter registration; and
(ii) enable election officials to review the eligibility of an applicant
and to administer voter registration and other aspects of the election process; and

HOUSE BILL 1113 7
(3) shall inform an applicant that if the applicant does not select a political
party affiliation, the individual will be designated as not affiliated with a political party
and will be unable to vote in a party primary election.
(d) An agent of an automatic voter registration agency who is responsible for
carrying out the requirements of this section may not:
(1) seek to influence an applicant’s political preference or party
registration;
(2) display any political preference or party allegiance; or
(3) make any statement to an applicant or take any action the purpose or
effect of which is to:
(i) discourage the applicant from registering to vote; or
(ii) lead the applicant to believe that a decision to register or not to
register has any bearing on the availability of services or benefits.
(E) EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN REGULATIONS ADOPTED BY THE
STATE BOARD, AN ENHANCED AUTOMATIC VOTER REGISTRATION SYSTEM MAY NOT
ELECTRONICALLY TRANSMIT THE VOTER REGISTRATION INFORMATION OF AN
APPLICANT TO THE STATE BOARD IF THE APPLICANT IS A PARTICIPANT IN THE
ADDRESS CONFIDENTIALITY PROGRAM UNDER TITLE 7, SUBTITLE 3 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(F) THE MOTOR VEHICLE ADMINISTRATION SHALL:
(1) IN ACCORDANCE WITH 6 C.F.R. §§ 37.13 AND 37.31, AND IN
CONSULTATION WITH THE STATE BOARD, IMPLEMENT PROCEDURES TO RELIABLY
RECORD AND VALIDATE THE SPECIFIC DOCUMENT THAT IS COMPLIANT WITH THE
REAL ID ACT AND PRESENTED BY AN APPLICANT FOR A REAL ID TRANSACTION;
(2) PERIODICALLY REVIEW THE PROCEDURES IMPLEMENTED UNDER
ITEM (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION; AND
(3) NOTIFY THE STATE BOARD REGARDING CHANGES TO THE
PROCEDURES IMPLEMENTED UNDER ITEM (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
[(e)] (G) The State Board shall ensure that each individual whose voter
registration information is transmitted to the State Board through an automatic voter
registration system is promptly registered to vote.

HOUSE BILL 1113
(H) (1) EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN REGULATIONS ADOPTED BY
THE STATE BOARD, THIS SUBSECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO AN APPLICANT WHO IS A
PARTICIPANT IN:
(I) THE ADDRESS CONFIDENTIALITY PROGRAM UNDER TITLE
7, SUBTITLE 3 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE; OR
(II) THE PERSONAL INFORMATION CONFIDENTIALITY PROGRAM
UNDER COMAR 33.04.02.01 THROUGH 33.04.02.07.
(2) EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN REGULATIONS ADOPTED BY
THE STATE BOARD, THE PROCEDURES REQUIRED IN THIS SUBSECTION DO NOT
APPLY WHEN VOTER REGISTRATION IS CLOSED UNDER § 3–302 OF THIS TITLE.
(3) IF AN APPLICANT’S VOTER REGISTRATION INFORMATION IS
TRANSMITTED TO THE STATE BOARD THROUGH AN ENHANCED AUTOMATIC VOTER
REGISTRATION SYSTEM AND NO OTHER INFORMATION INDICATES THAT THE
APPLICANT IS NOT QUALIFIED TO BE A REGISTERED VOTER, THE STATE BOARD
SHALL:
(I) IF THE APPLICANT IS CURRENTLY REGISTERED TO VOTE IN
THE STATE AND HAS CHANGED THE APPLICANT’S NAME OR ADDRESS:
1. ELECTRONICALLY ENTER THE APPLICANT’S CHANGE
OF NAME OR ADDRESS INTO THE STATEWIDE VOTER REGISTRATION LIST;
2. SEND THE APPLICANT AN ENHANCED AUTOMATIC
VOTER REGISTRATION UPDATE NOTICE WITHIN 10 BUSINESS DAYS AFTER RECEIPT
OF THE APPLICANT’S VOTER REGISTRATION INFORMATION FROM THE MOTOR
VEHICLE ADMINISTRATION; AND
3. IF THE APPLICANT AFFIRMATIVELY CORRECTS THE
UPDATE IN WRITING, MODIFY THE APPLICANT’S INFORMATION APPROPRIATELY IN
THE STATEWIDE VOTER REGISTRATION LIST;
(II) IF THE APPLICANT IS NOT REGISTERED TO VOTE:
1. SEND THE APPLICANT AN ENHANCED AUTOMATIC
VOTER REGISTRATION NOTICE WITHIN 10 BUSINESS DAYS AFTER RECEIPT OF THE
APPLICANT’S VOTER REGISTRATION INFORMATION FROM THE MOTOR VEHICLE
ADMINISTRATION;

HOUSE BILL 1113 9
2. IF THE APPLICANT DOES NOT AFFIRMATIVELY
DECLINE TO BE REGISTERED TO VOTE WITHIN 21 DAYS AFTER THE MAILING OF THE
ENHANCED AUTOMATIC VOTER REGISTRATION NOTICE, ELECTRONICALLY ENTER
THE APPLICANT’S VOTER REGISTRATION INFORMATION INTO THE STATEWIDE
VOTER REGISTRATION LIST WITH ACTIVE VOTER STATUS AND DEEM THE
APPLICANT’S VOTER REGISTRATION APPLICATION AS HAVING BEEN RECEIVED ON
THE DATE OF THE REAL ID TRANSACTION; AND
3. IF THE APPLICANT AFFIRMATIVELY DECLINES TO BE
REGISTERED TO VOTE WITHIN 21 DAYS AFTER THE MAILING OF THE ENHANCED
AUTOMATIC VOTER REGISTRATION NOTICE, CANCEL THE APPLICANT’S VOTER
REGISTRATION INFORMATION FROM THE STATEWIDE VOTER REGISTRATION LIST
AND DEEM THE APPLICANT TO HAVE NEVER REGISTERED TO VOTE OR ATTEMPTED
TO REGISTER TO VOTE.
[(f)] (I) If the State Board receives notice from an individual that the individual
was inadvertently registered to vote through an automatic voter registration agency after
declining to register to vote, the State Board shall correct the error in accordance with §
3–601.1 of this title.
[(g)] (J) Voter registration information or information relating to the decision of
an applicant at an automatic voter registration agency to decline to register to vote may
not be used for any purpose other than the maintenance of registration statistics, election
administration, or prosecution of criminal violations of the election law.
[(h)] (K) Notwithstanding § 3–501 of this title and § 4–401 of the General
Provisions Article, the identity of an automatic voter registration agency through which a
particular voter has registered may not be disclosed to the public.
(L) THE STATE BOARD MAY:
(1) IDENTIFY ADDITIONAL STATE, FEDERAL, OR LOCAL AGENCIES,
INCLUDING FEDERAL AGENCIES THAT ADMINISTER NATURALIZATION CEREMONIES,
THAT IN THE REGULAR COURSE OF BUSINESS RELIABLY VERIFY APPLICANTS’
CITIZENSHIP BY VERIFYING DOCUMENTS OR THROUGH AN ELECTRONIC DATABASE
MATCH; AND
(2) WITH THE CONSENT OF AN AGENCY IDENTIFIED UNDER ITEM (1)
OF THIS SUBSECTION, IMPLEMENT THE PROCEDURES FOR ENHANCED AUTOMATIC
VOTER REGISTRATION IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (H) OF THIS SECTION.
(M) THE STATE BOARD MAY DELEGATE ANY OF THE DUTIES ASSIGNED TO
THE STATE BOARD IN THIS SECTION TO THE LOCAL BOARDS.

HOUSE BILL 1113
[(i)] (N) The State Board may adopt regulations as necessary to implement this
section.
[(j)] (O) (1) Each automatic voter registration agency shall[:
(i) on or before July 1, 2019, submit a report, in accordance with §
2–1257 of the State Government Article, to the Senate Education, Health, and
Environmental Affairs Committee and the House Committee on Ways and Means that
describes:
1. the efforts of the automatic voter registration agency to
register voters in the preceding calendar year; and
2. the implementation of an automatic voter registration
system; and
(ii)] on or before [January 1, 2020, and] January 1 each [subsequent]
year, submit a report, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, to the
Senate COMMITTEE ON Education, [Health, and Environmental Affairs Committee]
ENERGY, AND THE ENVIRONMENT and the House Committee on Ways and Means that
describes:
[1.] (I) the number of individuals who completed an
applicable transaction OR REAL ID TRANSACTION in the preceding calendar year at the
automatic voter registration agency and the number of those individuals who registered to
vote or updated a voter registration record; and
[2.] (II) any efforts the automatic voter registration agency
plans to make to improve the efficiency and effectiveness of the voter registration process
at the agency.
(2) The Department of Human Services shall consolidate and submit the
reports required under paragraph [(1)(i) and (ii)] (1) of this subsection as a single document
on behalf of all the local departments of social services.
3–303.
(a) Notification of a change of party affiliation or a change to or from a decline
may be made:
(1) by information provided on a voter registration application by the same
methods provided for registration under Subtitle 2 of this title;
(2) by written notice, signed by the voter and sent by mail or otherwise
delivered to the local board in the county where the voter’s current voter registration
address is located or to which the voter has moved;

HOUSE BILL 1113 11
(3) by making application in person at the office of the local board in the
county where the voter’s current voter registration address is located or to which the voter
has moved;
(4) by information on a voter authority card or other appropriate form filled
out in a polling place; or
(5) by changing a name or address with the Motor Vehicle Administration.
(b) Party affiliation changes or changes to or from a decline:
(1) shall be processed at any time that registration is open; and
(2) except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, may not be processed
when registration is closed.
(c) If a local board receives a request for a party affiliation change after the close
of registration, the local board shall make the change and it shall become effective for the
next election provided:
(1) there is sufficient evidence, as determined by the local boards pursuant
to regulations adopted by the State Board, that the request was mailed on or before the
close of registration for that election; [or]
(2) the request was submitted by the voter to the Motor Vehicle
Administration, a voter registration agency, another local board, or the State Board on or
before the close of registration for that election; OR
(3) THE REQUEST WAS SUBMITTED BY A VOTER:
(I) WHOSE VOTER REGISTRATION INFORMATION WAS
TRANSMITTED TO THE STATE BOARD UNDER § 3–203(H)(3)(II) OF THIS TITLE;
(II) WHO HAS NOT AFFILIATED WITH A POLITICAL PARTY SINCE
THE TIME THE VOTER’S VOTER REGISTRATION INFORMATION WAS SENT TO THE
STATE BOARD UNDER § 3–203(H)(3)(II) OF THIS TITLE; AND
(III) WHO MAKES THE REQUEST ON:
1. A VOTER AUTHORITY CARD OR OTHER APPROPRIATE
FORM FILLED OUT IN A POLLING PLACE; OR
2. AN ABSENTEE BALLOT APPLICATION.

HOUSE BILL 1113
3–503.
(a) If a voter fails to respond to a confirmation notice under § 3–502(c) of this
subtitle, the voter’s name shall be placed into inactive status on the statewide voter
registration list.
(b) A voter shall be restored to active status on the statewide voter registration
list after:
(1) completing and signing any of the following election documents:
[(1)] (I) a voter registration application;
[(2)] (II) a petition governed by Title 6 of this article;
[(3)] (III) a certificate of candidacy;
[(4)] (IV) an absentee ballot application; or
[(5)] (V) a written affirmation of residence completed on election day to
entitle the voter to vote either at the election district or precinct for the voter’s current
residence or the voter’s previous residence, as determined by the State Board; OR
(2) COMPLETING A REAL ID TRANSACTION THAT RESULTS IN THE
TRANSMISSION OF VOTER REGISTRATION INFORMATION TO THE STATE BOARD
UNDER § 3–203(H)(3)(I) OF THIS TITLE.
(c) An inactive voter who fails to vote in an election in the period ending with the
second general election shall be removed from the statewide voter registration list.
(d) Registrants placed into inactive status may not be counted for official
administrative purposes including establishing precincts and reporting official statistics.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the report submitted by the
Motor Vehicle Administration on or before January 1, 2026, under § 3–203(o) of the Election
Law Article, as enacted by Section 1 of this Act, is not required to include information on
the number of individuals who completed a REAL ID transaction in the immediately
preceding calendar year.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.